apertium-hyw.hyw.lexd
 
#!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
#!!!  M O R P H O T A C T I C S  !!!
#!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

# I don't use zero affixes for nominative or accusative
# I don't separate syncretic genitive and dative
# Not making եան declension because obsolete
#Not making եաց class From Hagopian grammar

########################################
########################################
########################################
### NOUN PARADIGMS
########################################
########################################
########################################
########################################

# TO DO: add attributive morphology but it's really hard to know what its distribution is: Dum-Tragut 2009 page 553, and it's mostly limited to spoken speech
#TO DO: remove repetition in output like ամիսը by reorganizing declensions based on Number

#All the main declension systems
PATTERNS
NounDeclRegular
NounDeclRisingClusters
InfinitivalDecl
AdjAdvDeclRegular
NounOtherPOSDeclRegular
NameDecl
ParticipleDeclension

#suffix-based declensions
NounDeclUtjunSuffix
NounDeclUmSuffix

#Full-declension patterns
NounDeclIrregMonoWithN
NounDeclRegularU
NounDeclIrregularTimeVan
NounDeclOldOch
NounDeclOldFamilyOAblaut

#Dative only patterns
NounDeclOldAnForm
NounDeclFamilyNkForm
NounDeclOldRandomOAblaut
NounDeclCountry

#Irregular words
NounDeclIrregReduce
NounDeclIrregReducePoly


 
PATTERN NounDeclRegular
#Singular
NounReg NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 CaseRegI? (Def|Poss)? 
NounReg NZero NouNinflBoundaryRed NSg0 CaseRegI? (Def|Poss)?  # Dir/LR

#Singular attributive
NounReg NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 AttributiveGenIDef|AttributiveInst
NounReg NZero NouNinflBoundaryRed NSg0 AttributiveGenIDef|AttributiveInst  # Dir/LR

#Plural
NounReg NZero NouNinflBoundary NPlReg CaseRegU? (Def|Poss)? 
NounReg NZero NouNinflBoundaryRed NPlReg CaseRegU? (Def|Poss)?  # Dir/LR

#Plural attributive
NounReg NZero NouNinflBoundary NPlReg AttributiveGenUDef|AttributiveInst
NounReg NZero NouNinflBoundaryRed NPlReg AttributiveGenUDef|AttributiveInst  # Dir/LR

#Plural possessive (separate line for instrumental)
NounReg NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0|NPlReg  	PossPl CaseRegPostPluralPoss Def|Poss
NounReg NZero NouNinflBoundaryRed NSg0|NPlReg  	PossPl CaseRegPostPluralPoss Def|Poss  # Dir/LR
NounReg NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0|NPlReg  	InsReg PossPl  Def|Poss
NounReg NZero NouNinflBoundaryRed NSg0|NPlReg  	InsReg PossPl  Def|Poss  # Dir/LR

#Not doing combo of plural possessive and of attributive because weird

PATTERN NounDeclRegularU
#This is for verbs that take ու in the genitive/dative
#This don't have high vowels that can reduce
#Singular
NounIrregU NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 CaseRegU? (Def|Poss)? 
NounIrregU NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 DatGenRegI (Def|Poss)?  # Dir/LR

NounIrregU NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 AttributiveGenUDef|AttributiveInst
NounIrregU NZero NouNinflBoundaryRed NSg0 AttributiveGenUDef|AttributiveInst  # Dir/LR

#Plural
NounIrregU NZero NouNinflBoundary NPlReg CaseRegU? (Def|Poss)? 

NounIrregU NZero NouNinflBoundary NPlReg AttributiveGenUDef|AttributiveInst
NounIrregU NZero NouNinflBoundaryRed NPlReg AttributiveGenUDef|AttributiveInst  # Dir/LR

#Plural possessive (separate line for instrumental)
NounIrregU NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0|NPlReg  PossPl CaseRegPostPluralPoss Def|Poss
NounIrregU NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0|NPlReg  InsReg PossPl  Def|Poss

PATTERN NameDecl
# For names or proper nouns. Don't have the NouNInflBoundary to block glide deletion
#Country names  are in separate category because some of them take -ia suffix
#Singular
NameBase   CaseRegI? (Def|Poss)? 

NameBase AttributiveGenIDef|AttributiveInst

#Plural
NameBase    NPlReg CaseRegU? (Def|Poss)? 

NameBase 	NPlReg AttributiveGenUDef|AttributiveInst


#Plural possessive (separate line for instrumental)
NameBase   NPlReg?  PossPl CaseRegPostPluralPoss Def|Poss
NameBase   NPlReg?  InsReg PossPl  Def|Poss

PATTERN NameBase
NameMaleGiven [<n><np><ant><m>:]
NameFemaleGiven [<n><np><ant><f>:]
NameMaleFemaleGiven [<n><np><ant><f_m>:]
NameMaleGivenLocation [<n><np><ant_m_top>:]
NameMaleFemaleGivenLocation [<n><np><ant_f_m_top>:]
NameFemaleGivenLocation [<n><np><ant_f_top>:]

NameFamily  [<n><np><pat>:]
NameGivenUnclassified [<n><np><ant>:]
 
PATTERN NounDeclIrregularTimeVan
#optional normal case
#Have to add noun-boundary before definite too in order to trigger glide deletion
#ժամ takes the above and dative ու

NounTimeVan|NounTimeVanU 	NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 CaseTimeVan? NouNinflBoundary (Def|Poss)? 
NounTimeVan|NounTimeVanU	NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 CaseRegI (Def|Poss)?  # Dir/LR
NounTimeVanU 	 			NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 DatGenRegU (Def|Poss)? # Dir/LR

#Singular attributive
#The ուանէ form is preferably treated as attributive
NounTimeVan|NounTimeVanU 	NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 AttributiveVan
NounTimeVan|NounTimeVanU	NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 AttributiveGenIDef|AttributiveInst   # Dir/LR
NounTimeVanU 	 			NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 AttributiveGenUDef|AttributiveInst   # Dir/LR


#Plural
NounTimeVan|NounTimeVanU NZero NouNinflBoundary NPlReg CaseRegU? (Def|Poss)?

NounTimeVan|NounTimeVanU NZero NouNinflBoundary NPlReg AttributiveGenUDef|AttributiveInst
 
#Plural possessive (separate line for instrumental)
NounTimeVan|NounTimeVanU NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0|NPlReg  PossPl CaseRegPostPluralPoss Def|Poss
NounTimeVan|NounTimeVanU NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0|NPlReg  InsReg PossPl  Def|Poss



#For irregulars among the time words
#For irregulars derived from adverbs like այսօր
#Bare adverb
NounTimeVanAdv AdvZero
#Without case, but with definite
NounTimeVanAdv AdvZero SubstZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 NouNinflBoundary (Def|Poss)
#With case
NounTimeVanAdv AdvZero SubstZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 CaseTimeVan NouNinflBoundary (Def|Poss)? 
NounTimeVanAdv AdvZero SubstZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 CaseRegI (Def|Poss)?  # Dir/LR

#Attributive
NounTimeVanAdv AdvZero SubstZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 AttributiveVan

#Plural
NounTimeVanAdv AdvZero SubstZero NouNinflBoundary NPlReg CaseRegU? (Def|Poss)? 

NounTimeVanAdv AdvZero SubstZero NouNinflBoundary NPlReg AttributiveGenUDef|AttributiveInst 

#Plural possessive (separate line for instrumental)
NounTimeVanAdv AdvZero SubstZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0|NPlReg  PossPl CaseRegPostPluralPoss Def|Poss
NounTimeVanAdv AdvZero SubstZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0|NPlReg  InsReg PossPl  Def|Poss

#For irregular հիմակուան from հիմա
NounTimeVanHima AdvZero
NounTimeVanHima [:կ] AdvZero SubstZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 CaseTimeVan NouNinflBoundary (Def|Poss)? 

#singular attributive
NounTimeVanHima [:կ] AdvZero SubstZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 AttributiveVan


#Plural possessive (separate line for instrumental)
NounTimeVanHima [:կուան] AdvZero SubstZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0|NPlReg  PossPl CaseRegPostPluralPoss Def|Poss
NounTimeVanHima [:կուան] AdvZero SubstZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0|NPlReg  InsReg PossPl  Def|Poss


#For reduced forms իրիկուն իրիկուան
#For reduced forms շաբաթ շաբթուան շաբթուն
NounTimeVanReducedBase|NounTimeVanUReducedBase NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 (Def|Poss)? 

NounTimeVanReducedReduced|NounTimeVanUReducedReduced NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 CaseTimeVan NouNinflBoundary (Def|Poss)?
NounTimeVanReducedBase|NounTimeVanUReducedBase NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 CaseRegI (Def|Poss)? # Dir/LR
NounTimeVanUReducedReduced NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 DatGenRegU (Def|Poss)? # Dir/LR

#attributive
NounTimeVanReducedReduced|NounTimeVanUReducedReduced NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 AttributiveVan
NounTimeVanReducedBase|NounTimeVanUReducedBase NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 AttributiveGenIDef|AttributiveInst # Dir/LR
NounTimeVanUReducedReduced NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 AttributiveGenUDef|AttributiveInst # Dir/LR

 
#Plural
NounTimeVanReducedBase|NounTimeVanUReducedBase NZero NouNinflBoundary NPlReg CaseRegU? (Def|Poss)? 

NounTimeVanReducedBase|NounTimeVanUReducedBase NZero NouNinflBoundary NPlReg AttributiveGenUDef|AttributiveInst

#Plural possessive (separate line for instrumental)
NounTimeVanReducedBase|NounTimeVanUReducedBase NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0|NPlReg  PossPl CaseRegPostPluralPoss Def|Poss
NounTimeVanReducedBase|NounTimeVanUReducedBase NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0|NPlReg  InsReg PossPl  Def|Poss
	

PATTERN NounDeclIrregReducePoly
#For nouns which reduce when they take irregular inflection
#But don't reduce when take normal inflection
#right now just գլուխ because ամիս can go under the -van words
#I take the -u form as less prefered
#Singular
NounIrregUReducePoly NZero NSg0 NouNinflBoundary CaseRegI? (Def|Poss)? 
NounIrregUReducePoly NZero NSg0 NouNinflBoundaryRed CaseRegI? (Def|Poss)?   # Dir/LR
NounIrregUReducePoly NZero NouNinflBoundaryRed NSg0 CaseRegU (Def|Poss)?   # Dir/LR

#attributive
NounIrregUReducePoly NZero NSg0 NouNinflBoundary AttributiveGenIDef|AttributiveInst
NounIrregUReducePoly NZero NSg0 NouNinflBoundaryRed AttributiveGenIDef|AttributiveInst   # Dir/LR
NounIrregUReducePoly NZero NouNinflBoundaryRed NSg0 AttributiveGenUDef|AttributiveInst   # Dir/LR

#Because polysyllabic, no need for reduction boundary
#Plural
NounIrregUReducePoly NZero  NouNinflBoundary NPlReg CaseRegU? (Def|Poss)? 

NounIrregUReducePoly NZero  NouNinflBoundary NPlReg AttributiveGenUDef|AttributiveInst 

#Plural possessive (separate line for instrumental)
NounIrregUReducePoly NZero  NouNinflBoundary NSg0|NPlReg  PossPl CaseRegPostPluralPoss Def|Poss
NounIrregUReducePoly NZero  NouNinflBoundary NSg0|NPlReg  InsReg PossPl  Def|Poss




PATTERN InfinitivalDecl
#For declined infinitivals, I assume they're not pluralized
#I don't add the reduction boundary as a safety precaution
#I make bare infinitival get analyezd as just a verb
#TO DO: I don't think they can take attributive, but I put them here just to be safe

#Singular caseless definite
Infinitival  NSg0 (Def|Poss)
Infinitival  NSg0 CaseRegU (Def|Poss)?
#Plural possessive (separate line for instrumental)
Infinitival   PossPl CaseRegPostPluralPoss Def|Poss
Infinitival   InsReg PossPl  Def|Poss

#Negation forms
#Singular caseless definite
:Neg Infinitival Neg: NSg0 (Def|Poss)
:Neg Infinitival Neg:  NSg0 CaseRegU (Def|Poss)?
#Plural possessive (separate line for instrumental)
:Neg Infinitival Neg:   PossPl CaseRegPostPluralPoss Def|Poss
:Neg Infinitival Neg:   InsReg PossPl  Def|Poss

#Attributive
Infinitival  NSg0 AttributiveGenUDef|AttributiveInst 
:Neg Infinitival Neg:  NSg0 AttributiveGenUDef|AttributiveInst 

PATTERN ParticipleDeclension
#Subject and perfect participle can take nominal inflection
ParticipleInflectable SubstZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0  (Def|Poss)
#With case, with/without definite
ParticipleInflectable SubstZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 CaseRegI (Def|Poss)? 


#Plural
ParticipleInflectable SubstZero NouNinflBoundary NPlReg CaseRegU? (Def|Poss)? 
#Plural possessive (separate line for instrumental)
ParticipleInflectable SubstZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0|NPlReg  PossPl CaseRegPostPluralPoss Def|Poss
ParticipleInflectable SubstZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0|NPlReg  InsReg PossPl  Def|Poss

#Negation forms
:Neg ParticipleInflectable Neg: SubstZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0  (Def|Poss)
#With case, with/without definite
:Neg ParticipleInflectable Neg:  SubstZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 CaseRegI (Def|Poss)? 

#Plural
:Neg ParticipleInflectable Neg:  SubstZero NouNinflBoundary NPlReg CaseRegU? (Def|Poss)? 
#Plural possessive (separate line for instrumental)
:Neg ParticipleInflectable Neg:  SubstZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0|NPlReg  PossPl CaseRegPostPluralPoss Def|Poss
:Neg ParticipleInflectable Neg:  SubstZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0|NPlReg  InsReg PossPl  Def|Poss
